Illinois, session 104th, HB736.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 20-129 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/20-129)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 20-129)7    Sec. 20-129. Retirement systems covered by article. This 8Article shall apply only to those retirement systems which 9have accepted it, as specified in the the respective divisions 10or Articles of this Code governing such systems.11(Source: Laws 1963, p. 161.)